Arkansas, session 2025, HB1464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-457. Parts for and repair of agricultural equipment and
machinery — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) "Agricultural equipment and machinery" means implements
used exclusively and directly in farming.
(B) “Agricultural equipment and machinery” includes
without limitation:
(i) Irrigation pipe used to carry water from an
irrigation well to the crops produced in farming regardless of whether the
irrigation pipe is used above ground or is buried underground;
(ii) Aviation machinery and equipment; and
(iii) Implements used to harvest crops produced in
farming by others.
(C) “Agricultural equipment and machinery” does not
*JLL140*
02/12/2025 11:07:54 AM JLL140

HB1464
include implements used in the production and severance of timber, motor
vehicles of a type subject to registration, or hand tools; and
(2) "Farming" means the agricultural production of food or fiber
as a business or the agricultural production of grass sod or nursery products
as a business.
(b) The gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale of the
following are exempt from the gross receipts tax levied by this chapter and
the compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949,
§ 26-53-101 et seq.:
(1) Parts purchased to modify, replace, or repair, in whole or
in part, existing agricultural equipment and machinery; and
(2) Services relating to the initial installation, alteration,
addition, cleaning, refinishing, replacement, or repair of agricultural
equipment and machinery.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on the
first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.



















02/12/2025 11:07:54 AM JLL140